North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 53. Modification and Enforcement of Dispositional Orders; Appeals. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-664 through 7A-674.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

For modification and enforcement of dispositional orders and appeals under the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-1000

et seq.